bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Риболов > Аксесоари за риболовни макари: Чанти и калъфи за риболовни макари; Лагери за риболовни макари; Комплект за почистване и поддръжка на риболовни макари; Зъбни колела и компоненти за задвижване на риболовни макари; Ръкохватки и дръжки за макари; Смазки за риболовни макари; Резервни шпули за риболовни макари
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Pesca > Accessori per mulinelli da pesca: Borse e custodie per mulinelli da pesca; Cuscinetti per mulinelli da pesca; Kit di pulizia e manutenzione per mulinelli da pesca; Ingranaggi e componenti di trasmissione per mulinelli da pesca; Manovelle e pomelli per mulinelli da pesca; Lubrificanti per mulinelli da pesca; Bobina sostitutiva per mulinelli da pesca
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Ribolov > Pribor za rolu za ribolov: Torbe i futrole za role za ribolov; Ležajevi za ribolovnu rolu; Kompleti za čišćenje i održavanje za ribolovnu rolu; Oprema i pogonske komponente za ribolovnu rolu; Ručke i kvake za ribolovnu rolu; Maziva za rolu za ribolov; Zamjenski koturi za ribolov
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Ribolov > Dodatki za ribiške kolute: Torbe in etuiji za ribiške kolute; Ležaji za ribiške role; Kompleti za čiščenje in vzdrževanje ribiških rol; Zobniki in pogonski deli ribiških rol; Ročaji in gumbi za ribiške kolute; Maziva za ribiške kolute; Nadomestne tuljave za ribiške kolute
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Pescuit > Accesorii mulinete de pescuit: Genți și cutii pentru mulinete de pescuit; Rulmenți pentru mulinete de pescuit; Kituri de curățare și întreținere a mulinetelor; Roți dințate și componente de antrenare pentru mulinete; Mânere și butoane pentru mulinete de pescuit; Lubrifianți pentru mulinete de pescuit; Bobine de schimb pentru mulinete de pescuit
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Câu cá > Phụ kiện máy câu cá: Hộp và túi đựng máy câu cá; Vòng bi máy câu; Bộ vệ sinh & bảo dưỡng máy câu; Bánh răng & bộ truyền động máy câu; Tay quay & núm máy câu; Dầu bôi trơn máy câu cá; Ống chỉ thay thế cho máy câu cá
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Angeln > Angelrollen-Zubehör: Taschen & Behälter; Kugellager für Angelrollen; Reinigungs- & Pflege-Sets für Angelrollen; Getriebe & Antriebskomponenten für Angelrollen; Kurbeln & Knäufe für Angelrollen; Schmierstoffe; Ersatzspulen
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Pesca > Accesorios para carretes de pesca: Bolsas y estuches para carretes de pesca; Rodamientos para carretes de pesca; Kits de limpieza y mantenimiento para carretes de pesca; Engranajes y componentes de transmisión para carretes de pesca; Manivelas y perillas para carretes de pesca; Lubricantes para carretes de pesca; Bobinas de recambio para carretes de pesca
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Pesca > Acessórios para carretilha: Estojos e sacolas para carretilha; Rolamentos para carretilhas e molinetes; Kits de limpeza e manutenção para carretilhas e molinetes; Engrenagens e componentes de tração para carretilhas; Manivelas e pegadores para carretilhas e molinetes; Lubrificantes para carretilha; Carretilhas para reposição
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Pêche > Accessoires pour moulinets: Sacs et étuis pour moulinets; Roulements de moulinet de pêche; Kits de nettoyage et d’entretien de moulinet de pêche; Engrenages et composants d’entraînement de moulinet de pêche; Manivelles et poignées de moulinet de pêche; Lubrifiants pour moulinets; Bobines de rechange pour moulinets
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Rybołówstwo > Akcesoria do kołowrotków wędkarskich: Torby i pokrowce na kołowrotki wędkarskie; Łożyska do kołowrotków; Zestawy do czyszczenia i konserwacji kołowrotków; Przekładnie i elementy napędowe kołowrotków; Korbki i uchwyty do kołowrotków; Smary do kołowrotków wędkarskich; Szpule zapasowe do kołowrotków wędkarskich
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > การตกปลา > อุปกรณ์รอกตกปลา: ถุงและกระเป๋ารอกตกปลา; ตลับลูกปืนรอกตกปลา; ชุดทำความสะอาดและบำรุงรักษารอกตกปลา; เฟืองและชิ้นส่วนขับเคลื่อนรอกตกปลา; แขนหมุนและน็อบรอกตกปลา; สารหล่อลื่นรอกตกปลา; อะไหล่แกนรอกตกปลา
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 釣魚 > 釣魚捲線器配件: 釣魚捲線器收納袋/盒; 捲線器培林與軸承; 捲線器清潔與保養工具包; 捲線器齒輪與驅動零件; 捲線器把手與握丸; 捲線器潤滑油; 釣魚捲線器備用線軸
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Fisking > Tilbehør til fiskesneller: Vesker og esker til fiskesneller; Kulelager til fiskesneller; Rensesett og vedlikeholdsutstyr for fiskesneller; Drev og drivverk til fiskesneller; Sveiver og håndtak til fiskesneller; Smøreolje til fiskesneller; Erstatningsspoler til fiskesneller
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Balıkçılık > Olta Makarası Aksesuarları: Olta Makarası Çantaları ve Kutuları; Olta makinesi rulmanları; Olta makinesi temizlik ve bakım kitleri; Olta makinesi dişlileri ve tahrik bileşenleri; Olta makinesi kolları ve topuzları; Olta Makarası Yağları; Olta Makarası Yedek Sargıları
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Rybolov > Príslušenstvo k rybárskym navijakom: Tašky a puzdrá na rybárske navijaky; Ložiská rybárskych navijakov; Súpravy na čistenie a údržbu rybárskych navijakov; Prevody a pohonné komponenty rybárskych navijakov; Rukoväte a tlačidlá rybárskych navijakov; Mazivá na rybárske navijaky; Náhradné cievky pre rybárske navijaky
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Horgászat > Horgászorsó-kiegészítők: Horgászorsótáskák és -tokok; Horgászorsó-csapágyak; Horgászorsó-tisztító és -karbantartó készletek; Horgászorsó-fogaskerekek és meghajtóelemek; Horgászorsó-hajtókarok és -fogantyúk; Horgászorsó-kenőanyagok; Horgászorsó-cserék
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Žvejyba > Žvejybos ričių priedai: Žvejybos ričių krepšiai ir dėklai; Žvejybinių ričių guoliai; Žvejybinių ričių valymo ir priežiūros rinkinys; Žvejybinių ričių pavaros ir variklio komponentai; Žvejybinių ričių rankenėlės ir rankenų galvutės; Žvejybos ričių tepalai; Žvejybos ričių atsarginiai būgnai
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Fishing > Fishing Reel Accessories: Fishing Reel Bags & Cases; Fishing Reel Bearings; Fishing Reel Cleaning & Maintenance Kits; Fishing Reel Gears & Drive Components; Fishing Reel Handles & Knobs; Fishing Reel Lubricants; Fishing Reel Replacement Spools
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Rybaření > Rybářské navijáky – příslušenství: Brašny a pouzdra na rybářské navijáky; Ložiska do rybářských navijáků; Sady na čištění a údržbu rybářských navijáků; Převody a díly k rybářským navijákům; Kličky a madla k rybářským navijákům; Maziva na rybářské navijáky; Náhradní cívky na rybářské navijáky
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Kalastus > Kalastuskelojen lisätarvikkeet: Kalastuskelalaukut ja -kotelot; Kelan laakerit; Kelan puhdistus- ja huoltosarjat; Kalastuskelan rattaat ja voimansiirto-osat; Kelan kammet ja nupit; Kalastuskelan voitelu; Kelojen varaosat
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Pesca > Acessórios para carretos de pesca: Sacos e estojos de carretos de pesca; Rolamentos para carretos de pesca; Kits de limpeza e manutenção para carretos de pesca; Engrenagens e componentes de transmissão para carretos de pesca; Manivelas e botões para carretos de pesca; Lubrificantes para carretos de pesca; Rolos de substituição para carretos de pesca
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Fiskeri > Tilbehør til fiskehjul: Tasker og kasser til fiskehjul; Kuglelejer til fiskehjul; Rengørings- og vedligeholdelsessæt til fiskehjul; Tandhjul og drevdele til fiskehjul; Håndtag og greb til fiskehjul; Smørelse til fiskehjul; Erstatningsspoler til fiskehjul
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 낚시 > 낚시릴 부대용품: 낚시릴 가방/케이스; 낚시 릴 베어링; 낚시 릴 세척 및 유지보수 키트; 낚시 릴 기어 및 드라이브 구성 요소; 낚시 릴 핸들 및 노브; 낚시릴 윤활제; 낚시릴 교체 스풀
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 钓鱼 > 钓鱼卷线器配件: 渔线轮袋/盒; 渔轮轴承; 渔轮清洁和维护套件; 渔轮齿轮和驱动组件; 渔轮手柄和摇臂把手; 钓鱼卷线器润滑油; 渔线轮更换线轴
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Vissen > Accessoires voor vismolens: Tassen en koffers voor vismolens; Lagers voor molens en reels; Reinigings- en onderhoudskits voor molens en reels; Tandwielen en aandrijfonderdelen voor molens en reels; Slingers en knoppen voor molens en reels; Smeermiddelen voor vismolens; Vervangende spoelen voor vismolens
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Ψάρεμα > Αξεσουάρ μηχανισμών ψαρέματος: Θήκες και τσάντες μηχανισμών ψαρέματος; Ρουλεμάν μηχανισμών ψαρέματος; Κιτ καθαρισμού & συντήρησης μηχανισμών ψαρέματος; Γρανάζια & εξαρτήματα κίνησης μηχανισμών ψαρέματος; Μανιβέλες & λαβές μηχανισμών ψαρέματος; Λιπαντικά μηχανισμών ψαρέματος; Ανταλλακτικές μπομπίνες μηχανισμών ψαρέματος
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Рыбалка > Аксессуары для рыболовных катушек: Сумки и футляры для рыболовных катушек; Подшипники для рыболовных катушек; Наборы для чистки и обслуживания рыболовных катушек; Шестерни и детали привода рыболовных катушек; Ручки и кнобы для рыболовных катушек; Смазка для рыболовных катушек; Шпули для рыболовных катушек
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > 釣り > 釣り用リール関連用品: 釣り用リールケース; リール用ベアリング; リール用クリーニング・メンテナンスキット; リール用ギア・ドライブパーツ; リール用ハンドル・ノブ; リール用潤滑剤; 交換用スプール
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Fiske > Tillbehör till spinnrullar: Väskor och askar för spinnrullar; Lager för fiskerullar; Rengörings- och underhållskit för fiskerullar; Kugghjul och drivkomponenter för fiskerullar; Vevarmar och knoppar för fiskerullar; Smörjmedel för spinnrullar; Ersättningsspolar för spinnrullar